Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.030

Affidavit of error or omission—Contents—Witnesses.

An affidavit of an elector filed pursuant to RCW 29A.68.013(3) must set forth specifically:

(1) The name of the contestant and that he or she is a registered voter in the county, district or precinct, as the case may be, in which the office or measure is to be exercised;

(2) The name of the person whose right is being contested or the name of the measure being contested;

(3) The office;

(4) The particular causes of the contest.

No statement of contest may be dismissed for want of form if the particular causes of contest are alleged with sufficient certainty. The person charged with the error or omission must be given the opportunity to call any witness, including the candidate.

[ 2016 c 130 s 4; 2007 c 374 s 5; 2003 c 111 s 1703; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 102; 1965 c 9 s 29.65.020. Prior: (i) Code 1881 s 3110; 1865 p 43 s 6; RRS s 5371. (ii) Code 1881 s 3112; 1865 p 44 s 8; RRS s 5373. Formerly RCW 29.65.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.